Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
In General

§ 29-3-1.
Board of education to have control; management of lands and funds as trust property; disapproval by board of supervisors of rental value of lands; definitions.

Sixteenth section school lands, or lands granted in lieu thereof, constitute property held in trust for the benefit of the public schools and must be treated as such. The board of education under the general supervision of the state land commissioner, shall have control and jurisdiction of said school trust lands and of all funds arising from any disposition thereof heretofore or hereafter made. It shall be the duty of the board of education to manage the school trust lands and all funds arising therefrom as trust property. Accordingly, the board shall assure that adequate compensation is received for all uses of the trust lands, except for uses by the public schools.

In the event the board of supervisors declines to approve the rental value of the land set by the board of education, the board of education shall within ten (10) days appoint one (1) appraiser, the board of supervisors shall within twenty (20) days appoint one (1) appraiser and the two (2) appraisers so appointed shall within twenty (20) days appoint a third appraiser whose duty it shall be to appraise the land, exclusive of buildings and improvements, the title to which is not held in trust for the public schools, and to file a written report with each board setting forth their recommendation for the rental value of the land within thirty (30) days. The cost of the appraisal shall be paid from any available sixteenth section school funds or other school funds of the district. If no appeal is taken within twenty (20) days as provided hereunder, the lease shall be executed in accordance with said recommended rental value within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the appraisers’ report. In the event any party is aggrieved by the decision of the appraisers setting forth the appraised rental value, the party so aggrieved shall be entitled to an appeal to the chancery court in which the land is located. Such appeal shall be taken within twenty (20) days following the decision. The chancery court, on appeal, may review all of the proceedings, may receive additional evidence, and make findings of fact, as well as conclusions of law to insure that a fair and reasonable return may be obtained on the sixteenth section lands or lands in lieu thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-01; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 341, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-1.1.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein, unless the context shall otherwise require.

“Board of education” shall mean that school board of the school district in whose present jurisdiction (i) is situated a sixteenth section of land, or (ii) was originally situated a sixteenth section of land for which land has been granted in lieu thereof. Provided, however, that in the event a sixteenth section is situated within two (2) or more school districts, the term “board of education” shall mean that school board whose school district embraces the greatest land area within the township in which said sixteenth section is located.

“Superintendent of education” shall mean that superintendent of schools of a school district whose board of education has control and jurisdiction over any sixteenth section lands or lands granted in lieu thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 1, as amended by Section 201 of Chapter 492, Laws, 1986; Laws, 2004, ch. 357, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 29-3-2.
Secretary of State to assist in school trust land management.

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to assist the local school districts, when so requested, in establishing and maintaining local school trust land management systems. The Secretary of State shall also identify and coordinate consultative services which might be available to the school districts from other agencies within the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 48; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 29-3-3.
Suits to establish title.

The board of education may employ one (1) or more competent persons to ascertain the true condition of the title and to institute and prosecute, in the chancery court of the county where the land lies, all necessary suits to establish and confirm the title to each parcel of such land and to fix the date of the expiration of any lease of the same. If any person claim any of said land in fee simple or upon any other terms than that of a lease to expire at a fixed date with absolute reversion to the state in trust, or if the title to such lands rest in parol by destruction of records or otherwise, suit shall be instituted at once or as soon as practicable to test the legality of such claims or to re-establish the lost record.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6756; 1942, § 6594; Laws, 1924, ch. 283; Laws, 1930, ch. 278; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-5.
Abstracts of title; alternative title searches by attorneys.

A complete abstract of title may be made of each parcel of said land, and such abstract shall contain references, by book and page, to the acts of congress, the acts of the legislature, and to all records relating thereto. Every such abstract shall be duly certified and recorded in the record of deeds, and be styled and indexed under the head of “School Trust Lands, S _______________ , T _______________ , R _______________ .” Said abstract shall be so styled and indexed whether the land be in a sixteenth section or in another section taken in lieu of it, and the original shall be deposited in the land office.

As an alternative to the requirements of subsection (1), a personal examination of the sixteenth section land records by a licensed practicing attorney of the State of Mississippi shall be sufficient, provided it is accompanied by an attorney’s title certificate and opinion certifying to the ownership of each sixteenth section. Said title certificate and opinion shall include a complete listing of all persons entitled to possession of said lands and the true condition of the title of said lands.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6757; 1942, § 6595; Laws, 1924, ch. 283; Laws, 1930, ch. 278; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-7.
Adverse possession.

Adverse possession for a period of twenty-five (25) years, under a claim of right or title, shall be prima facie evidence in such case that the law authorizing the disposition of the lands has been complied with and the lease or sale duly made. If the claim be under a lease, the time at which the lease expires shall be fixed by the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6758; 1942, § 6596; Laws, 1924, ch. 283; Laws, 1930, ch. 278.

§ 29-3-9.
Compliance with title requirements.

In all cases where this chapter has not been complied with, the official involved shall forthwith comply with same. It shall be the duty of the state land commissioner to ascertain whether or not said statutes have been complied with. If said state land commissioner shall find that said statutes have not been complied with in any case, he shall call the same to the attention of the board of education involved. If any board of education shall fail or refuse to comply with the mandate of this section, then the action of mandamus shall lie to compel such compliance, and such action may be brought either by the attorney general or any resident citizen of the State of Mississippi on the relation of the attorney general. If the state land commissioner shall find that any board of education is failing to take the necessary steps to effectively comply with said statutes in any case, he shall so certify to the attorney general. It shall thereupon be the duty of the attorney general to institute an action for issuance of a writ of mandamus as hereinabove provided, and to such end he is hereby authorized and empowered to employ competent local counsel to assist him in the prosecution of the same. It shall also be the duty of the state land commissioner in conjunction with the attorney general, to submit a special report in writing to the next regular session of the legislature, which said report shall set forth any instances of noncompliance with said chapter and the steps which have been taken to secure compliance with same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-04; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 4; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-11.
Board of education to ascertain whether county has title to lieu lands; certification to land commissioner where it does not.

It shall likewise be the duty of the board of education to ascertain whether or not such county has title to all lieu lands to which it may, by law, be entitled. If it is determined that such county does not have title to all such lands, the board of education shall certify the fact to the state land commissioner who shall institute proper proceedings to secure such lands for such county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-05; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 5; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-13.
Exchange of lieu land with state.

When the state owns land in a county which owns land located in another county granted in lieu of the sixteenth section school lands, generally known as “lieu lands,” the Governor and land commissioner acting for the state and the board of education acting for such county may, by written agreement, exchange the land owned by the state in such county for “lieu lands” owned by such county in another county.

The title to the state-owned land shall be conveyed to such county by a patent signed by the Governor and land commissioner as other patents are executed under the law. The title to the lieu lands shall be conveyed to the state by deed signed by the superintendent of education on order of the board of education. The written agreement between the state and the county shall be recorded in the minutes of said board of education.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6627; Laws, 1936, ch. 319; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-15.
Sale of lieu lands situated outside county.

Land granted in lieu of sixteenth section lands in this state and situated outside of the county holding or owning the same may be sold. Such lands shall be sold in accordance with the provisions of Sections 29-3-15 through 29-3-25, and the proceeds from such sales may be invested in the manner prescribed by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 4115, 6597-02; Laws, 1942, ch. 162; Laws, 1948, ch. 497, § 3.

§ 29-3-17.
Lieu land commission.

A commission is hereby established to be known as the lieu land commission, hereinafter referred to as the commission, and such commission shall consist of the attorney general, who shall be ex officio chairman, the secretary of state and the state land commissioner, who shall be ex officio secretary. Said lieu land commission shall have authority to sell all lands granted in lieu of sixteenth section land and located out of the county owning such land situated in the State of Mississippi. From and after July 1, 1981, said lieu land commission shall proceed to sell all such lands granted in lieu of sixteenth section land and located out of the county owning such land situated in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4116; Laws, 1942, ch. 162; Laws, 1948, ch. 486; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-19.
Purchase of lieu lands.

Any person desiring to purchase such lands shall file his application for the purchase of same with said lieu land commission upon application blanks to be supplied by said commission for said purpose, and said commission shall fix the price to be charged for said land; provided, however, in no event shall more than one hundred sixty (160) acres of said lands be sold to one (1) person within one (1) year, and in no event shall said lands be sold for less than the fair market value of the land. If the commission approves the application, said application shall then be forwarded to the superintendent of education of the county owning said land. In the event the superintendent and board of education approve said sale, the approval by said board of education being made by order of said board duly entered on its minutes, agreeing on the purchase price of said lands, then the Secretary of State and the Governor shall issue to such applicant a patent to such lands at and for the price agreed upon, such patent to be signed in accordance with the law governing the issuance of state patents. The money received therefor shall be paid into the proper principal fund as provided in Section 29-3-113. Provided, however, the proceeds from the sale of such lieu lands may be used to purchase equivalent lands in the county which owned such lieu lands so sold, said purchase to be made as provided in Section 29-3-27.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4117; Laws, 1942, ch. 162; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 12; Laws, 1989, ch. 375, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 430, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 22, 1989).

§ 29-3-21.
Mineral rights in lieu lands.

All oil and mineral rights in and to the lieu lands disposed of under the provisions of Sections 29-3-15 through 29-3-25 shall be retained by said lieu land commission and shall remain the property of the township owning said lieu land.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4118; Laws, 1942, ch. 162; Laws, 1978, ch. 25, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-23.
Proceeds of sale of lieu lands.

The proceeds derived from such sales shall be used for the benefit of the schools situated in the township owning the lands. The principal derived from the sale of such land shall not be spent, but only the interest and income derived from such funds may be spent.

[Repealed]

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4119; Laws, 1942, ch. 162; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 14; Laws, 1999, ch. 369, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 15, 1999).

§ 29-3-25.
Report of sale of lieu lands.

Said lieu land commission shall make a report to the Legislature every year, setting forth a statement of all such lands sold during that year, and shall file a copy of said report with the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4120; Laws, 1942, ch. 162; Laws, 1970, ch. 551, eff from and after July 1, 1970.

§ 29-3-27.
Sale of lands situated within school district.

No sixteenth section lands or lands granted in lieu thereof, in whole or in part, situated within the school district holding or owning the same shall ever be sold, except that the board of education may, under the procedures hereinafter provided, sell such lands for industrial development thereon, therein, or thereunder to any persons, firms, or corporations in fee simple, or any lesser estate therein, for a purchase price not less than the fair market value thereof; and when any such sale is made, the deed shall be executed in the name of the State of Mississippi by the superintendent of the said board of education.

As used in this section and in Sections 29-3-29 and 29-3-61, the term “industrial development” shall include restoration as a tourist attraction the place where an organization was founded, which said organization has since been expanded to be national or international in its membership, scope, and influence.

As used in this section and in Sections 29-3-29 and 29-3-61, the term “industrial development” shall also include the consolidation of multiple parcels, each less than 160 acres and not to exceed 320 acres total, of forested sixteenth section lieu land as originally contained in Indemnity List 1 of School Sections approved February 26, 1859, and located in the same county as its controlling school district. Said consolidated parcels shall be utilized to facilitate significant timber industry research. This provision shall stand repealed on December 31, 2016.

The proceeds of the sale in fee simple of any sixteenth section, or lands granted in lieu thereof, in whole or in part, or such part of said proceeds as may be required to purchase acreage of equivalent fair market value, shall be used by the board of education, to purchase other land in the county, which land shall be held in the name of and reserved by the State of Mississippi for the support of the township schools in lieu of the land thus sold, as other sixteenth section lieu land is held, and shall be subject to all laws applicable thereto. Every such sale and every such purchase of land in lieu thereof shall be reported by the secretary of the board of education to the Secretary of State and to the State Forestry Commission within ninety (90) days after the consummation of each such sale and purchase. Any funds from a sale in fee simple of any sixteenth section land, or land granted in lieu thereof, in excess of any amount used to purchase said land in lieu thereof, shall be treated as corpus and shall be invested by the board of education as provided by law. Only the income from such investment shall be expended for current operating expenses of the schools.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6759; 1942, § 6597; Laws, 1924, ch. 283; Laws, 1930, ch. 278; Laws, 1946, ch. 443, § 1; Laws, 1948, ch. 497, § 1; Laws, 1961, 2nd Ex Sess ch. 2, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 364, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 411, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 15; Laws, 1989, ch. 430, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 379, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 6, 2016).

§ 29-3-29.
Sales for use as industrial parks.

Before any sixteenth section school land or land granted in lieu thereof may be sold or leased for industrial development thereon, therein or thereunder under the provisions of this chapter, the board of education controlling such land shall first determine that such sale or lease will be fair market value. In the determination of the fair market value of said land the comparative sales method shall be used, and the highest and best use of said sixteenth section lands shall be determined on the basis of finding that said land shall be susceptible to any use that comparative land in private ownership may be used, that there will be prompt and substantial industrial development on, in, or under said land after the sale or lease, that the acreage to be sold or leased is not in excess of the amount of land reasonably required for immediate use and for such future expansion as may be reasonably anticipated, and that such sale or lease will be beneficial to and in the best interest of the schools of the district for which said land is held. All of said findings, including the amount of the sale price or gross rental for said land, shall be spread on the minutes of the board of education. Also, if the board of education proposes to sell said land, said board shall first enter into a contract or obtain a legal option to purchase, for a specified price not in excess of fair market value, other land in the county of acreage of equivalent fair market value, and such contract or option shall be spread on the minutes of said board. However, not more than one hundred (100) acres in any one (1) sixteenth section school lands in any county may be sold under this chapter for the purpose of being made an industrial park or a part of such industrial park, provided the provisions of this section and Sections 57-5-1 and 57-5-23 are fully complied with.

A certified copy of the resolution or order of the board of education, setting out the foregoing findings, together with a certified copy of the order approving and setting out the terms of the contract or option to purchase other lands where a sale of land is proposed and an application to the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board for the certificate authorizing said sale or lease, shall be forwarded to the county board of supervisors, which board shall make an independent investigation of the proposed sale or lease and of the proposed purchase of other land.

If said county board of supervisors shall concur in the finding of fact of the board of education, and shall find that it is to the best interests of the schools of the district to enter into such sale or lease, it may enter on its minutes a resolution or order approving the action of the board of education.

If the said county board of supervisors shall not concur in the findings of the board of education, or shall find that the proposed sale or lease will not be in the best interest of the schools of the district, then it may, by resolution or order, disapprove the proposed sale or lease, and such action shall be final.

Except as otherwise permitted by Section 57-75-37(4)(f), there shall be reserved all minerals in, on, and under any lands conveyed under the provisions hereof. Provided, however, that in any county bordering on the State of Alabama, traversed by the Tombigbee River, in which U.S. Highway 82 intersects U.S. Highway 45 and in which is situated a state supported institution of higher learning, upon the sale of any sixteenth section lands for industrial purposes as provided by law, the board of education, the superintendent of education and the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, may sell and convey all minerals except oil, gas, sulphur and casinghead gas on, in and under the said sixteenth section lands so sold for industrial purposes. Said oil, gas, sulphur and casinghead gas shall be reserved together with such rights of use, ingress and egress as shall not unreasonably interfere with the use of the lands by the purchaser. Prior written approval for such use, ingress and egress, shall be obtained from the surface owner or, if such approval is unreasonably withheld, may be obtained from the chancery court of the county in which said land is located.

Certified copies of the resolutions or orders of the board of supervisors and of the board of education and of the application to the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board shall be transmitted to the county superintendent of education, if there be one in the county, who, if he approves the proposed sale or lease, shall so certify and forward same to the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board. If there be no county superintendent of education in the county, then the board of education whose district embraces the entire county shall so certify and transmit said copies to the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board for further action.

Upon receipt of the aforesaid application and certified copies of the said resolution and orders, the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board shall make investigation to determine whether or not the proposed sale or lease of said land will promote prompt and substantial industrial development thereon, therein, or thereunder. If the board finds that such sale or lease will promote prompt and substantial industrial development thereon, therein or thereunder, and further finds that the person, firm or corporation who proposes to establish said industry is financially responsible, and that the acreage to be sold or leased is not in excess of the amount of land reasonably required for immediate use and for such future expansion as may be reasonably anticipated, then the board, in its discretion, may issue a certificate to the board of education of said district so certifying, and said certificate shall be the authority for the board of education to enter into the proposed sale or lease. If the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board does not so find, then it shall decline to issue said certificate which action shall be final.

The Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, when issuing a certificate to the county board of education certifying its findings and authorizing said sale or lease, may, nevertheless, in its discretion, make such sale or lease conditioned on and subject to the vote of the qualified electors of said district. Upon receipt of a certificate so conditioned upon an election, or upon a petition as hereinafter provided for, the board of education, by resolution spread upon its minutes, shall forward a copy of the certificate to the board of supervisors who by resolution upon its minutes, shall call an election to be held in the manner now provided by law for holding county elections, and shall fix in such resolution a date upon which such an election shall be held, of which not less than three (3) weeks notice shall be given by the clerk of said board of supervisors by publishing a notice in a newspaper published in said county once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks preceding the same, or if no newspaper is published in said county, then in a newspaper having a general circulation therein, and by posting a notice for three (3) weeks preceding said election at three (3) public places in said county. At such election, all qualified voters of the county may vote, and the ballots used shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the proposed sale or lease of said land, including the description and price, together with the words “For the proposed sale or lease” and the words “Against the proposed sale or lease,” and the voter shall vote by placing a cross (x) or check (v) opposite his choice of the proposition. Should the election provided for herein result in favor of the proposed sale or lease by at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast being in favor of the said proposition, the board of supervisors shall notify the board of education who may proceed forthwith to sell or lease said land in accordance with the proposition so submitted to the electors. If less than two-thirds (2/3) of those voting in such special election vote in favor of the said sale or lease, then said land shall not be sold or leased.

The board of education shall further be required, prior to passing of a resolution expressing its intent to sell said land, to publish a notice of intent to sell said land for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in said county or, if there be none, in a newspaper having a general circulation in said county, and to post three (3) notices thereof in three (3) public places in said county, one (1) of which shall be at the courthouse, for said time. If within the period of three (3) weeks following the first publication of said intent, a petition signed by twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of said county shall be filed with the board of supervisors requesting an election concerning the sale, then an election shall be called as hereinabove provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6597-01; Laws, 1948, ch. 497, § 2; Laws, 1961, 2nd Ex Sess ch. 2, § 2; Laws, 1962, ch. 364, § 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 412, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 397; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 16; Laws, 1989, ch. 430, § 4; Laws, 2016, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 8, 2016).

§ 29-3-31.
Survey and classification of lands in Choctaw Purchase.

It is hereby made the duty of the board of education, using the services of all appropriate public agencies, to survey and classify all sixteenth section lands in the Choctaw purchase and lands granted in lieu thereof reserved for the support of township schools. Said lands shall be classified into eight (8) categories, as follows: (1) forest land; (2) agricultural land; (3) industrial land; (4) commercial land; (5) farm-residential land; (6) residential land; (7) recreational land; and (8) other land. The classifications shall be applied to said lands based upon the finding of the highest and best use of each parcel or tract for producing a maximum of revenue by proper utilization. In determining the highest and best use of these lands, the same principles shall be followed as are applied in determining the highest and best use of land in private ownership. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, all land that is being used as “residential land” or “farm-residential land” shall continue to be classified as “residential land” or “farm-residential land” until such land ceases to be used as a residence.

All sixteenth section lands in the Choctaw purchase and lands granted in lieu thereof, regardless of classification, shall be deemed to contain oil, gas and minerals, including the following: (a) oil, gas, carbon dioxide and other gaseous substances; (b) metals, compounds of metals or metal-bearing ores; (c) coal, including anthracite, bituminous, subbituminous, lignite and their constituent components and products and minerals intermingled or associated therewith; and (d) sulphur, salt, sand, gravel, fill dirt and clay.

Such oil, gas and minerals shall be leased for exploration, mining, production and development as provided for in Section 29-3-99, regardless of the classifications of the lands in, on or under which such oil, gas and minerals are situated. Statutory procedures for the leasing of the surface of the land in such eight (8) classifications shall not apply to such oil, gas and minerals in, on or under such lands.

Such oil, gas and minerals shall be deemed a separate classification of sixteenth section lands for the purpose of Section 211 of the Mississippi Constitution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-06; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 6; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 17; Laws, 1992, ch. 486 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 7, 1992).

§ 29-3-33.
Lands defined for classification.

For the purpose of determining the proper category for such lands and the oil, gas and other minerals in, on and under such lands, the following definitions shall be controlling unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Forest land” shall mean all land at least ninety percent (90%) of the total area of which is at present forest or wasteland, or land which will produce a maximum of revenue by utilization to produce timber or other forest products, shall be classified as forest land. The unit of measurement to be used in arriving at the classification of forest land shall be the smallest division of the government survey covering said lands in counties where such government survey has been made, and in other counties shall be forty (40) acres.

“Agricultural land” shall mean land most suitable for pasturage or cultivation.

“Industrial land” shall mean land most suitable for port, harbor, industrial, manufacturing or warehousing use.

“Commercial land” shall mean land most suitable for wholesale or retail businesses, financial institutions, professional offices and clinics, service trades and occupations, privately owned public utilities and similar businesses.

“Residential land” shall mean any tract of land upon which the lessee or board-approved sub-lessee is residing. Such lands shall be set up, as nearly as possible, in a rectangular form so as to include the houses and such other permanent improvements as may have been placed thereon by said lessee or his predecessor in title; provided, however, that such tract of land shall not exceed five (5) acres.

“Farm residential land” shall mean any tract of land upon which a leaseholder resides not exceeding one hundred sixty (160) acres in size existing on July 1, 1978, which is utilized for agricultural purposes. Provided, however, that farm residential land may consist of two (2) noncontiguous tracts not exceeding one hundred sixty (160) acres in the aggregate (a) with reasonable easements connecting the residential and outlying tracts; or (b) within the residential tract situated a distance not exceeding one and one-half (11/2) miles from the outlying tract. Provided further that no sixteenth section lands or lands granted in lieu thereof, situated in a county lying wholly or partially within a levee district shall be classified as farm residential land.

“Recreational land” shall mean land most suitable for uses which provide for activities or services of a recreational nature. Recreational nature shall include, but not be limited to, parks, campsites, lodges and similar uses and facilities.

“Catfish farming land” shall mean land most suitable for the construction of catfish ponds and for wholesale or retail catfish farm raising and harvesting.

“Other land” shall mean any land which is not suitable for any of the uses described above.

“Oil, gas and minerals” shall mean the following: (i) oil, gas, carbon dioxide and other gaseous substances; (ii) metals, compounds of metals, or metal-bearing ores; (iii) coal, including anthracite, bituminous, subbituminous, lignite and their constituent components and products and minerals intermingled or associated therewith; and (iv) sulphur, salt, sand, gravel, fill dirt and clay, in, on and under the lands classified above. Such oil, gas and minerals shall be a classification of land separate and distinct from the classifications set forth above in paragraphs (a) through (h) inclusive.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-07; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 7; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 18; Laws, 1992, ch. 486 § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 623, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 29-3-35.
Public agencies to assist in classification.

The board of education is authorized and empowered to supervise and direct the classification of all sixteenth section lands or lieu lands, according to the definition hereinabove set out. In making the classifications provided by Sections 29-3-31 through 29-3-39, the board of education is authorized and empowered to request the services of any public agency within this state which is equipped and qualified to assist in such classification. It is hereby made the duty of any such agency when so requested to assist the board of education in making such classification.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-08; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 8; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-37.
Objections to classification.

At any time when any or all portions of such land lying in a county shall have been classified as hereinabove required, a classification report shall be compiled by the board of education and filed with the public lands division of the secretary of state who shall provide forms for such purpose. The board of education shall immediately cause notice to be given of the completion of such classification, such notice to be published in a newspaper in said county once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks, or if no newspaper is published in said county then in a newspaper having a general circulation therein, listing all lands so classified and notifying all parties in interest that they will have a right to appeal and object to the classification as made. If no objections are made as to the classification of any particular parcel of said land by the public lands division of the secretary of state or any other party in interest, which objection must be reduced to writing and filed with the chancery clerk within thirty (30) days from the date of the final publication, the classification as to such parcel or parcels of land shall be final. A copy of such notice shall be mailed by the superintendent of education to each lessee of any part of such lands, such notice to be so mailed not later than the date of the first publication of the notice of the classification of such land, which notice shall also set forth the classification which has been established for all lands under lease by such lessee. If objections are filed, then the matter shall be heard by the chancery court in term time or in vacation, and the court shall either confirm or modify the classification as the circumstances shall demand. Upon the filing of such objection by an individual other than the public lands division of the secretary of state, the chancery clerk shall immediately forward a certified copy of such objection to the public lands division of the secretary of state and the appropriate board of education, along with any necessary service of process. The public lands division of the Secretary of State and any other person aggrieved by the order of the chancery court shall have the same rights of appeal as is provided by law for appeals from other orders of the chancery court, and such appeal shall be perfected as other appeals are now required to be so perfected.

The cost of any such classification or reclassification under Section 29-3-39 shall be paid from any available sixteenth section school funds or other school funds of the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-09; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 9; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 20; Laws, 1983, ch. 454, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1983).

§ 29-3-39.
Reclassification of lands.

It shall be the duty of the board of education to survey periodically the classification of all sixteenth section land under its jurisdiction and to reclassify that land as it may deem advisable because of changes of conditions, and when any land is so reclassified, the board of education shall file a report thereof with the Secretary of State. From time to time the Secretary of State may institute proceedings to reclassify any sixteenth section lands which he may deem advisable and when any land is so reclassified, the Secretary of State shall file a report thereof with the board of education. When any land is reclassified under this section, notice thereof, rights to object thereto and rights to appeal therefrom shall be given in the same manner provided in Section 29-3-37 with reference to the original classification. However, all sixteenth section land shall be classified, or reclassified as is necessary, within one (1) year prior to the expiration date of any existing lease, and within sixty (60) days of the terminating of any lease of sixteenth section land by final court order. In all litigation which may result from the classification or reclassification of lands by the Secretary of State under Sections 29-3-31 through 29-3-39, the Secretary of State shall be represented by the Attorney General, who shall have control of the litigation except as otherwise authorized in Section 7-5-39, but it shall be the duty of the various boards of education to furnish local legal assistance when requested so to do by the Attorney General.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-10; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 10; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 21; Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 29-3-40.
Farm residential or residential lands exchanged for other lands of equal value.

The land commissioner is authorized, in his discretion, to make a feasibility study to determine if sixteenth section lands and lieu lands classified as farm residential or residential lands could be exchanged for other lands of equal value located within the same county, without injury to the value of the lands held in trust for the public schools.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 50, eff from and after July 1, 1978.